Illinois, session 104th, SB3302.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Racing 5Facility Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Motorsport racing" means a competitive sport in which 8motor vehicles or motorcycles are raced against each other to 9achieve the fastest times or distances.10    "Racing facility" or "racetrack" means a designated area 11or facility where horse races or motorsport races are 12conducted. "Racing facility" or "racetrack" includes the 13track, spectator areas, horse stalls, garages, and any 14associated grounds or buildings used to operate the races. 15    Section 10. Liability. No person licensed under the 16Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 or any person that owns a 17racing facility used for motorsport racing that is authorized 18by a recognized national authority or a unit of local 19government may be subject to a civil action brought by a 20surrounding property owner to the racing facility or racetrack 21for allegations of nuisance, taking, or other theory if the 22racing facility or racetrack was built before the surrounding   SB3302- 2 -LRB104 15760 JRC 28948 b1real property owner either purchased the real property or 2built in the area of the racing facility or racetrack.